Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5703
Definitions,
where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Advantage Act,
the definitions found in sections 77-5704 to 77-5721 shall be used.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 25;

Laws 2008, LB895, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB1118, § 2.